Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 4. Registration and Recognition of Orders from Other States.

§ 64.2-2116.
Registration of guardianship orders.

If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the appointment of a guardian is not pending in the Commonwealth, the guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship order in the Commonwealth by filing as a foreign judgment in a court, in any appropriate county or city of the Commonwealth, certified copies of the order and letters of office.

History.

2011, c. 518, §
37.2-1048; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2117.
Registration of conservatorship orders.

If a conservator has been appointed in another state and a petition for a conservatorship order is not pending in the Commonwealth, the conservator appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the conservatorship order in the Commonwealth by filing as a foreign judgment in a court of the Commonwealth, in any county or city in which property belonging to the protected person is located, certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond.

History.

2011, c. 518, §
37.2-1049; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2118.
Effect of registration.

Upon registration of a guardianship or conservatorship order from another state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in the Commonwealth all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of the Commonwealth, including maintaining actions and proceedings in the Commonwealth and, if the guardian or conservator is not a resident of the Commonwealth, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

A court of the Commonwealth may grant any relief available under this chapter and other laws of the Commonwealth to enforce a registered order.

History.

2011, c. 518, §
37.2-1050; 2012, c. 614.